Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Hepatitis B.

Sec. 18.15.250.
Hepatitis B testing and vaccination program for volunteer emergency personnel.

The department shall establish a program under which hepatitis B testing and vaccination is reasonably accessible at no charge to all volunteer emergency medical and rescue personnel in the state who provide an emergency medical or rescue service primarily within an unincorporated community or within a municipality that does not provide funding for the service.

A municipality that has the power to do so shall establish a program under which hepatitis B testing and vaccination is reasonably accessible at no charge to all law enforcement officers and all volunteer or employed emergency medical and rescue personnel who provide service to the public within the municipality. The department shall, upon request, assist a municipality in establishing a program required under this subsection.

The Department of Public Safety shall establish a program under which hepatitis B testing and vaccination is reasonably accessible at no charge to all officers of the state troopers. The Department of Health and Social Services shall, upon request, assist the Department of Public Safety in establishing a program required under this subsection.

In this section,

“emergency medical and rescue personnel” means a trauma technician, emergency medical technician, rescuer, or mobile intensive care paramedic;

“employed” means that the person is a paid employee of a first responder service, a rescue service, an ambulance service, or a fire department that provides emergency medical or rescue services as part of its duties;

“law enforcement officer” means a member of the police force of a municipality;

“volunteer” means that the person is an active volunteer of a first responder service, a rescue service, an ambulance service, or a fire department that provides emergency medical or rescue services as part of its duties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1991; am § 22 ch 36 SLA 1993)